public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ir évemi/L [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évemi/L [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évemi/L [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évemi/L [nr]guir
SFX A ir évemi/L [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évemi/L arveñir
SFX A ir évemi/L derokir
SFX A ir évemi/L desavir
SFX A ir évemi/L dir
SFX A ir évemi/L interiŧir
SFX A ir évemi/L interlokuir
SFX A ir évemi/L intiriŧir
SFX A ir évemi/L karpir
SFX A ir évemi/L perseguir
SFX A ir évemi/L pervertir
SFX A ir évemi/L rokir
SFX A ir évemi/L seguir
SFX A ir évemi/L servir
SFX A ir évemi/L superbir
SFX A ir évemi/L teñir
SFX A ir évemi/L vertir
SFX A ir évemi/L veñir
SFX A ir évemi/L xeguir
SFX A ir évemi/L ŧernir
SFX A ir évemi/L ŧerpir
SFX A ir évemi/L ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évemi/L ŧokir
SFX A ir évimo/M [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évimo/M [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évimo/M [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évimo/M [anou]pir
SFX A ir évimo/M [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évimo/M [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évimo/M [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évimo/M [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évimo/M [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évimo/M [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évimo/M [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évimo/M [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évimo/M [nr]guir
SFX A ir évimo/M [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évimo/M arveñir
SFX A ir évimo/M derokir
SFX A ir évimo/M desavir
SFX A ir évimo/M dir
SFX A ir évimo/M interiŧir
SFX A ir évimo/M interlokuir
SFX A ir évimo/M intiriŧir
SFX A ir évimo/M karpir
SFX A ir évimo/M perseguir
SFX A ir évimo/M pervertir
SFX A ir évimo/M rokir
SFX A ir évimo/M seguir
SFX A ir évimo/M servir
SFX A ir évimo/M superbir
SFX A ir évimo/M teñir
SFX A ir évimo/M vertir
SFX A ir évimo/M veñir
SFX A ir évimo/M xeguir
SFX A ir évimo/M ŧernir
SFX A ir évimo/M ŧerpir
SFX A ir évimo/M ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évimo/M ŧokir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [anou]pir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [nr]guir
SFX A ir évimoni/N [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évimoni/N arveñir
SFX A ir évimoni/N derokir
SFX A ir évimoni/N desavir
SFX A ir évimoni/N dir
SFX A ir évimoni/N interiŧir
SFX A ir évimoni/N interlokuir
SFX A ir évimoni/N intiriŧir
SFX A ir évimoni/N karpir
SFX A ir évimoni/N perseguir
SFX A ir évimoni/N pervertir
SFX A ir évimoni/N rokir
SFX A ir évimoni/N seguir
SFX A ir évimoni/N servir
SFX A ir évimoni/N superbir
SFX A ir évimoni/N teñir
SFX A ir évimoni/N vertir
SFX A ir évimoni/N veñir
SFX A ir évimoni/N xeguir
SFX A ir évimoni/N ŧernir
SFX A ir évimoni/N ŧerpir
SFX A ir évimoni/N ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évimoni/N ŧokir
SFX A ir évitu/P [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évitu/P [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évitu/P [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évitu/P [anou]pir
SFX A ir évitu/P [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évitu/P [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évitu/P [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évitu/P [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évitu/P [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évitu/P [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évitu/P [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évitu/P [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évitu/P [nr]guir
SFX A ir évitu/P [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évitu/P arveñir
SFX A ir évitu/P derokir
SFX A ir évitu/P desavir
SFX A ir évitu/P dir
SFX A ir évitu/P interiŧir
SFX A ir évitu/P interlokuir
SFX A ir évitu/P intiriŧir
SFX A ir évitu/P karpir
SFX A ir évitu/P perseguir
SFX A ir évitu/P pervertir
SFX A ir évitu/P rokir
SFX A ir évitu/P seguir
SFX A ir évitu/P servir
SFX A ir évitu/P superbir
SFX A ir évitu/P teñir
SFX A ir évitu/P vertir
SFX A ir évitu/P veñir
SFX A ir évitu/P xeguir
SFX A ir évitu/P ŧernir
SFX A ir évitu/P ŧerpir
SFX A ir évitu/P ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évitu/P ŧokir
SFX A ir évomi/L [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir évomi/L [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir évomi/L [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir évomi/L [anou]pir
SFX A ir évomi/L [ao]rdir
SFX A ir évomi/L [ao]rnir
SFX A ir évomi/L [ao]rtir
SFX A ir évomi/L [aou]rbir
SFX A ir évomi/L [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir évomi/L [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir évomi/L [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir évomi/L [ft]erdir
SFX A ir évomi/L [nr]guir
SFX A ir évomi/L [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir évomi/L arveñir
SFX A ir évomi/L derokir
SFX A ir évomi/L desavir
SFX A ir évomi/L dir
SFX A ir évomi/L interiŧir
SFX A ir évomi/L interlokuir
SFX A ir évomi/L intiriŧir
SFX A ir évomi/L karpir
SFX A ir évomi/L perseguir
SFX A ir évomi/L pervertir
SFX A ir évomi/L rokir
SFX A ir évomi/L seguir
SFX A ir évomi/L servir
SFX A ir évomi/L superbir
SFX A ir évomi/L teñir
SFX A ir évomi/L vertir
SFX A ir évomi/L veñir
SFX A ir évomi/L xeguir
SFX A ir évomi/L ŧernir
SFX A ir évomi/L ŧerpir
SFX A ir évomi/L ŧirkuir
SFX A ir évomi/L ŧokir
SFX A ir í [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir í [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A ir í [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir í [adgiptu]rir
SFX A ir í [ae]mir
SFX A ir í [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A ir í [aeilou]tir
SFX A ir í [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir í [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir í [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir í [ai]nsir
SFX A ir í [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir í [aio]stir
SFX A ir í [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir í [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir í [anou]pir
SFX A ir í [ao]ntir
SFX A ir í [ao]rdir
SFX A ir í [ao]rnir
SFX A ir í [ao]rtir
SFX A ir í [aou]rbir
SFX A ir í [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir í [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir í [eiou]lir
SFX A ir í [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A ir í [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir í [ft]erdir
SFX A ir í [ir]morir
SFX A ir í [jl]estir
SFX A ir í [nr]guir
SFX A ir í [ps]entir
SFX A ir í [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir í arguir
SFX A ir í arveñir
SFX A ir í censir
SFX A ir í derokir
SFX A ir í desavir
SFX A ir í dir
SFX A ir í dormir
SFX A ir í ensir
SFX A ir í esir
SFX A ir í frir
SFX A ir í interiŧir
SFX A ir í interlokuir
SFX A ir í intiriŧir
SFX A ir í karpir
SFX A ir í mentir
SFX A ir í morir
SFX A ir í nguir
SFX A ir í orir
SFX A ir í perseguir
SFX A ir í pervertir
SFX A ir í rokir
SFX A ir í salir
SFX A ir í seguir
SFX A ir í servir
SFX A ir í skarmir
SFX A ir í superbir
SFX A ir í teñir
SFX A ir í vertir
SFX A ir í vestir
SFX A ir í veñir
SFX A ir í xeguir
SFX A ir í xmentir
SFX A ir í ŧernir
SFX A ir í ŧerpir
SFX A ir í ŧirkuir
SFX A ir í ŧokir
SFX A ir í/FQ [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A ir í/FQ [adgiptu]rir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ae]mir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aeilou]tir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aeinu]kir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aeiou]nir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aeiu]bir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ai]nsir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ailoru]sir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aio]stir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aiou]ñir
SFX A ir í/FQ [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A ir í/FQ [anou]pir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ao]ntir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ao]rdir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ao]rnir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ao]rtir
SFX A ir í/FQ [aou]rbir
SFX A ir í/FQ [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A ir í/FQ [blnrt]uir
SFX A ir í/FQ [eiou]lir
SFX A ir í/FQ [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A ir í/FQ [fsx]ierir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ft]erdir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ir]morir
SFX A ir í/FQ [jl]estir
SFX A ir í/FQ [ps]entir
SFX A ir í/FQ [pt]erveñir
SFX A ir í/FQ arguir
SFX A ir í/FQ arveñir
SFX A ir í/FQ censir
SFX A ir í/FQ derokir
SFX A ir í/FQ desavir
SFX A ir í/FQ dir
SFX A ir í/FQ dormir
SFX A ir í/FQ ensir
SFX A ir í/FQ esir
SFX A ir í/FQ frir
SFX A ir í/FQ interiŧir
SFX A ir í/FQ interlokuir
SFX A ir í/FQ intiriŧir
SFX A ir í/FQ karpir
SFX A ir í/FQ mentir
SFX A ir í/FQ morir
SFX A ir í/FQ nguir
SFX A ir í/FQ orir
SFX A ir í/FQ perseguir
SFX A ir í/FQ pervertir
SFX A ir í/FQ rokir
SFX A ir í/FQ salir
SFX A ir í/FQ seguir
SFX A ir í/FQ servir
SFX A ir í/FQ skarmir
SFX A ir í/FQ superbir
SFX A ir í/FQ teñir
SFX A ir í/FQ vertir
SFX A ir í/FQ vestir
SFX A ir í/FQ veñir
SFX A ir í/FQ xeguir
SFX A ir í/FQ xmentir
SFX A ir í/FQ ŧernir
SFX A ir í/FQ ŧerpir
SFX A ir í/FQ ŧirkuir
SFX A ir í/FQ ŧokir
SFX A ir ía/KQS [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A ir ía/KQS [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A ir ía/KQS [aeilnosu]tir
