public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
dexabitar/A
alastar/A
inalborar/A
realŧar/A
andar/A
ankorar/A
àrder/A
inarkar/A
arxarar/A
atergar/A
augurar/A
autoriđar/A
inaxolar/A
dexbafarar/A
baɉar/A
balar/A
balbetar/A
inbalordir/A
rabaltar/A
bandir/A
xbaraɉar/A
barkiđar/A
bàter/A
inbaukir/A
xbefeɉar/A
xberlar/A
bevuŧar/A
xbigolar/A
inbirir/A
bixegolar/A
abokar/A
bolsegar/A
rebondolar/A
exborsar/A
aboŧar/A
dexbragesar/A
xbrasolar/A
abreviar/A
xbrojar/A
inbronkar/A
budelar/A
dexbusolar/A
xbuxetar/A
casar/A
decèñer/A
soscéñer/A
descodar/A
interdir/A
debutar/A
destreɉar/A
diramar/A
dokumentar/A
pardonar/A
indormenŧar/A
indriŧar/A
inđalir/A
đónxer/A
sperđurar/A
eliminar/A
estenuar/A
exíster/A
stupefar/A
faldeɉar/A
fangar/A
infatir/A
scarifegar/A
speŧifegar/A
infenocar/A
fermar/A
fiabar/A
fiaskar/A
desfigurar/A
konfinar/A
sfioriđar/A
dexafitar/A
desfogar/A
foleđar/A
inforkar/A
desfornar/A
fraɉar/A
frapolar/A
fraŧionar/A
fríđer/A
sfronxar/A
refuɉar/A
ofuskar/A
ingaɉar/A
dexganasar/A
xgarbar/A
xgarxar/A
xgianŧar/A
gomitar/A
governar/A
ingranar/A
granxir/A
xgravar/A
ingretolir/A
xgriñolir/A
ingropar/A
inguantar/A
xguarnir/A
reguxar/A
indavalkar/A
inɉuriar/A
inrikir/A
intrivelar/A
abiurar/A
xɉaŧar/A
inɉòter/A
deskàder/A
kaiđar/A
kalkañar/A
rekalŧar/A
deskanar/A
deskankarar/A
skantinar/A
inkapelar/A
deskapuɉar/A
skargar/A
karpionar/A
kasar/A
rekatar/A
inkatorigolar/A
prekavar/A
kaxermar/A
deskodegar/A
kokolar/A
deskolorir/A
inkomenŧiar/A
kondir/A
koniar/A
konsultar/A
kontrolar/A
kopiar/A
skoraɉir/A
inkordelar/A
kortelar/A
deskoŧar/A
kréder/A
skreventar/A
krolar/A
inkroxar/A
kuatar/A
kuestuar/A
rinkular/A
inkurar/A
deskúxer/A
lanpar/A
lasar/A
laurear/A
relegar/A
deletar/A
libar/A
likuidar/A
liŧenŧiar/A
dexlojar/A
lotar/A
lustrar/A
amaestrar/A
makinar/A
dimandar/A
manipolar/A
marangonar/A
marinar/A
maselar/A
matir/A
maxarar/A
strameđar/A
menaŧar/A
menxonar/A
deméter/A
sotométer/A
dexminconar/A
mitigar/A
mokolar/A
inmonar/A
dexmontegar/A
demòrder/A
mostar/A
xmòver/A
muɉar/A
xmusar/A
muŧar/A
naspar/A
negrir/A
ninar/A
denonŧiar/A
nuklear/A
ñiñolar/A
ofiŧiar/A
omologar/A
onorar/A
ordenar/A
abortir/A
oxar/A
padir/A
inpakar/A
paleŧar/A
spalpuñar/A
spanpanar/A
desparir/A
despaređar/A
konpartir/A
sorpasar/A
inpastrocar/A
spatriar/A
spavenar/A
rapegar/A
spelatar/A
dispénder/A
despenolar/A
inpeocar/A
perlar/A
pestolar/A
despetenar/A
speŧegar/A
repiantar/A
inpicolar/A
spikar/A
despionbar/A
inpironar/A
spiumar/A
konplegar/A
despolpar/A
póner/A
opóner/A
ponsar/A
pontiđar/A
porkeđar/A
postar/A
potenŧiar/A
prèmer/A
preŧiar/A
prinŧipiar/A
inprovar/A
despupilar/A
spuŧolir/A
radobar/A
ramar/A
ranđar/A
raspar/A
recolar/A
remar/A
rexegar/A
riduŧar/A
rivar/A
roesar/A
roinar/A
korónper/A
rovegar/A
inruđenir/A
rusar/A
sabionar/A
sakosar/A
salivar/A
salvar/A
sapunir/A
savarɉar/A
scikar/A
sekir/A
seguir/A
perseguitar/A
deseleđar/A
insenetir/A
señar/A
seraɉar/A
malsestar/A
siar/A
silenŧiar/A
siringar/A
sixolar/A
skapolar/A
inskarselar/A
skenar/A
skoar/A
skòter/A
skuamar/A
insokar/A
soletar/A
sonar/A
sorbir/A
sovraniđar/A
spàrxer/A
sperar/A
prospetar/A
spinfarar/A
splénder/A
sprangar/A
kontrastar/A
kontrastajar/A
stanŧiar/A
instekir/A
stimar/A
restituir/A
istolidir/A
destranir/A
konstrénđer/A
stropar/A
destrúxer/A
destuđar/A
sudar/A
insultar/A
susiar/A
stabarar/A
taɉuŧar/A
takiđar/A
tanbuxar/A
tardir/A
tartaɉar/A
destavelar/A
tèmer/A
sotinténder/A
tenpoređar/A
tentinagar/A
konteñir/A
mantèñer/A
intratéñer/A
soterar/A
atestar/A
tikiñar/A
tiraneɉar/A
toler/A
toneđar/A
intorbiar/A
stornar/A
tosir/A
estràer/A
trakanar/A
tranxar/A
estratar/A
estràxer/A
tresar/A
intrigar/A
detronar/A
introxar/A
turbiar/A
inŧangolar/A
konŧéder/A
inŧénder/A
ŧerkar/A
eŧetuar/A
ŧimar/A
deŧipar/A
ŧokolar/A
inŧupar/A
urmar/A
reuxar/A
valer/A
vanpir/A
vareŧar/A
véder/A
xveɉar/A
venar/A
ventiđar/A
deskonveñir/A
devèñer/A
sovèñer/A
invergolar/A
konversar/A
pervèrter/A
investigar/A
invidar/A
vinkolar/A
viŧiar/A
provixionar/A
evokar/A
dexvoltar/A
invòlxer/A
inxakolar/A
xautar/A
xbrisar/A
inxeñatolar/A
dexiderar/A
xlauranar/A
xoetar/A
rexultar/A
